Virginia statutes. Title 4.1. Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Control.
Article 2. Licenses Granted by Board; Limitations; Revocation and Suspension.
§ 4.1-206.3.
(Effective until July 1, 2024) Retail licenses.

The Board may grant the following mixed beverages licenses:

Mixed beverage restaurant licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in dining areas and other designated areas of such restaurant or off-premises consumption. Such license may be granted only to persons (i) who operate a restaurant and (ii) whose gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises, after issuance of such license, amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food. For the purposes of this subdivision, other designated areas shall include outdoor dining areas, whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises, which outdoor dining areas may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare, provided such areas are under the control of the licensee and approved by the Board. Such noncontiguous designated areas shall not be approved for any retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

.

If the restaurant is located on the premises of a hotel or motel with no fewer than four permanent bedrooms where food and beverage service is customarily provided by the restaurant in designated areas, bedrooms, and other private rooms of such hotel or motel, such licensee may (a) sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in such designated areas, bedrooms, and other private rooms or off-premises consumption and (b) sell spirits packaged in original closed containers purchased from the Board for on-premises consumption to registered guests and at scheduled functions of such hotel or motel only in such bedrooms or private rooms. However, with regard to a hotel classified as a resort complex, the Board may authorize the sale and on-premises consumption of alcoholic beverages in all areas within the resort complex deemed appropriate by the Board. Nothing herein shall prohibit any person from keeping and consuming his own lawfully acquired spirits in bedrooms or private rooms.

If the restaurant is located on the premises of and operated by a private, nonprofit, or profit club exclusively for its members and their guests, or members of another private, nonprofit, or profit club in another city with which it has an agreement for reciprocal dining privileges, such license shall also authorize the licensees to (1) sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises or off-premises consumption and (2) sell spirits that are packaged in original closed containers with a maximum capacity of two fluid ounces or 50 milliliters and purchased from the Board for on-premises consumption. Where such club prepares no food in its restaurant but purchases its food requirements from a restaurant licensed by the Board and located on another portion of the premises of the same hotel or motel building, this fact shall not prohibit the granting of a license by the Board to such club qualifying in all other respects. The club’s gross receipts from the sale of nonalcoholic beverages consumed on the premises and food resold to its members and guests and consumed on the premises shall amount to at least 45 percent of its gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food. The food sales made by a restaurant to such a club shall be excluded in any consideration of the qualifications of such restaurant for a license from the Board.

If the restaurant is located on the premises of and operated by a municipal golf course, the Board shall recognize the seasonal nature of the business and waive any applicable monthly food sales requirements for those months when weather conditions may reduce patronage of the golf course, provided that prepared food, including meals, is available to patrons during the same months. The gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises, after the issuance of such license, shall amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food on an annualized basis.

If the restaurant is located on the premises of and operated by a culinary lodging resort, such license shall authorize the licensee to (A) sell alcoholic beverages, without regard to the amount of gross receipts from the sale of food prepared and consumed on the premises, for off-premises consumption or for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board and other designated areas of the resort, including outdoor areas under the control of the licensee, and (B) permit the possession and consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages by persons to whom overnight lodging is being provided in bedrooms and private guest rooms.

If the restaurant is located on the premises of a mixed beverage casino licensee owned by an operator licensed under Article 3 (§

58.1-4108

et seq.) of Chapter 41 of Title 58.1, such mixed beverage restaurant license shall authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption on the licensed premises of the restaurant during all hours of operation of the mixed beverage casino licensee. Any alcoholic beverages purchased from such restaurant may be (I) taken onto the premises of the mixed beverage casino licensee and (II) possessed or consumed in areas designated by the Board, after consultation with the mixed beverage casino licensee. Designated areas may include any areas on the premises of the mixed beverage casino licensee, including entertainment venues, conference rooms, private rooms, hotels, pools, marinas, or green spaces. Alcoholic beverages purchased from a restaurant pursuant to this subdivision shall be contained in glassware or a paper, plastic, or similar disposable container that clearly displays the name or logo of the restaurant from which the alcoholic beverage was purchased.

The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption and in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to §

4.1-233.1

.

Mixed beverage caterer’s licenses, which may be granted only to a person regularly engaged in the business of providing food and beverages to others for service at private gatherings or at special events, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption. The annual gross receipts from the sale of food cooked and prepared for service and nonalcoholic beverages served at gatherings and events referred to in this subdivision shall amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food.

Mixed beverage limited caterer’s licenses, which may be granted only to a person regularly engaged in the business of providing food and beverages to others for service at private gatherings or at special events, not to exceed 12 gatherings or events per year, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption. The annual gross receipts from the sale of food cooked and prepared for service and nonalcoholic beverages served at gatherings and events referred to in this subdivision shall amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food.

Mixed beverage carrier licenses to persons operating a common carrier of passengers by train, boat, bus, or airplane, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages anywhere in the Commonwealth to passengers while in transit aboard any such common carrier, and in designated rooms of establishments of air carriers at airports in the Commonwealth. For purposes of supplying its airplanes, as well as any airplanes of a licensed express carrier flying under the same brand, an air carrier licensee may appoint an authorized representative to load alcoholic beverages onto the same airplanes and to transport and store alcoholic beverages at or in close proximity to the airport where the alcoholic beverages will be delivered onto airplanes of the air carrier and any such licensed express carrier. The air carrier licensee shall (i) designate for purposes of its license all locations where the inventory of alcoholic beverages may be stored and from which the alcoholic beverages will be delivered onto airplanes of the air carrier and any such licensed express carrier and (ii) maintain records of all alcoholic beverages to be transported, stored, and delivered by its authorized representative. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to §

4.1-233.1

.

Annual mixed beverage motor sports facility licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell mixed beverages, in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans, during scheduled events, as well as events or performances immediately subsequent thereto, to patrons in all dining facilities, seating areas, viewing areas, walkways, concession areas, or similar facilities, for on-premises consumption. Such license may be granted to persons operating food concessions at an outdoor motor sports facility that (i) is located on 1,200 acres of rural property bordering the Dan River and has a track surface of 3.27 miles in length or (ii) hosts a NASCAR national touring race. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to § 4.1-233.1.

Limited mixed beverage restaurant licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve dessert wines as defined by Board regulation and no more than six varieties of liqueurs, which liqueurs shall be combined with coffee or other nonalcoholic beverages, for on-premises consumption in dining areas of the restaurant or off-premises consumption. Such license may be granted only to persons who operate a restaurant and in no event shall the sale of such wine or liqueur-based drinks, together with the sale of any other alcoholic beverages, exceed 10 percent of the total annual gross sales of all food and alcoholic beverages. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to § 4.1-233.1.

Annual mixed beverage performing arts facility licenses, which shall (i) authorize the licensee to sell, on the dates of performances or events, alcoholic beverages in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans for on-premises consumption in all seating areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, similar facilities, and other areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board and (ii) automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to § 4.1-233.1. Such licenses may be granted to the following:

Corporations or associations operating a performing arts facility, provided the performing arts facility (i) is owned by a governmental entity; (ii) is occupied by a for-profit entity under a bona fide lease, the original term of which was for more than one year’s duration; and (iii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards;

Persons operating food concessions at any performing arts facility located in the City of Norfolk or the City of Richmond, provided that the performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than five years; (ii) has a capacity in excess of 1,400 patrons; (iii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards; and (iv) has monthly gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises that meet or exceed the monthly minimum established by Board regulations for mixed beverage restaurants;

Persons operating food concessions at any performing arts facility located in the City of Waynesboro, provided that the performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than five years; (ii) has a total capacity in excess of 550 patrons; and (iii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards;

Persons operating food concessions at any performing arts facility located in the arts and cultural district of the City of Harrisonburg, provided that the performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than five years; (ii) has been rehabilitated in accordance with historic preservation standards; (iii) has monthly gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises that meet or exceed the monthly minimum established by Board regulations for mixed beverage restaurants; and (iv) has a total capacity in excess of 900 patrons;

Persons operating food concessions at any multipurpose theater located in the historical district of the Town of Bridgewater, provided that the theater (i) is owned and operated by a governmental entity and (ii) has a total capacity in excess of 100 patrons;

Persons operating food concessions at any outdoor performing arts amphitheater, arena, or similar facility that has seating for more than 20,000 persons and is located in Prince William County or the City of Virginia Beach;

Persons operating food concessions at any outdoor performing arts amphitheater, arena, or similar facility that has seating for more than 5,000 persons and is located in the City of Alexandria or the City of Portsmouth; or

Persons operating food concessions at any corporate and performing arts facility located in Fairfax County, provided that the corporate and performing arts facility (i) is occupied under a bona fide long-term lease, management, or concession agreement, the original term of which was more than one year and (ii) has a total capacity in excess of 1,400 patrons. Such license shall authorize the sale, on the dates of performances or events, of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Combined mixed beverage restaurant and caterer’s licenses, which may be granted to any restaurant or hotel that meets the qualifications for both a mixed beverage restaurant pursuant to subdivision 1 and mixed beverage caterer pursuant to subdivision 2 for the same business location, and which license shall authorize the licensee to operate as both a mixed beverage restaurant and mixed beverage caterer at the same business premises designated in the license, with a common alcoholic beverage inventory for purposes of the restaurant and catering operations. Such licensee shall meet the separate food qualifications established for the mixed beverage restaurant license pursuant to subdivision 1 and mixed beverage caterer’s license pursuant to subdivision 2. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to § 4.1-233.1.

Bed and breakfast licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to (i) serve alcoholic beverages in dining areas, private guest rooms, and other designated areas to persons to whom overnight lodging is being provided, with or without meals, for on-premises consumption only in such rooms and areas, and without regard to the amount of gross receipts from the sale of food prepared and consumed on the premises and (ii) permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages by persons to whom overnight lodging is being provided in (a) bedrooms or private guest rooms or (b) other designated areas of the bed and breakfast establishment. For purposes of this subdivision, “other designated areas” includes outdoor dining areas, whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises, which may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare, provided that such outdoor dining areas are under the control of the licensee and approved by the Board. Such noncontiguous designated areas shall not be approved for any retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

.

Museum licenses, which may be issued to nonprofit museums exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, which shall authorize the licensee to (i) permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee by any bona fide member and guests thereof and (ii) serve alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee to any bona fide member and guests thereof. However, alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way by the licensee. The privileges of this license shall be limited to the premises of the museum, regularly occupied and utilized as such.

Motor car sporting event facility licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to permit the consumption of lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises of the licensee by patrons thereof during such events. However, alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way, directly or indirectly, by the licensee. The privileges of this license shall be limited to those areas of the licensee’s premises designated by the Board that are regularly occupied and utilized for motor car sporting events.

Commercial lifestyle center licenses, which may be issued only to a commercial owners’ association governing a commercial lifestyle center, which shall authorize any retail on-premises restaurant licensee that is a tenant of the commercial lifestyle center to sell alcoholic beverages to any bona fide customer to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold for consumption on that portion of the licensed premises of the commercial lifestyle center designated by the Board, including (i) plazas, seating areas, concourses, walkways, or such other similar areas and (ii) the premises of any tenant location of the commercial lifestyle center that is not a retail licensee of the Board, upon approval of such tenant, but excluding any parking areas. Only alcoholic beverages purchased from such retail on-premises restaurant licensees may be consumed on the licensed premises of the commercial lifestyle center, and such alcoholic beverages shall be contained in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers with the name or logo of the restaurant licensee that sold the alcoholic beverage clearly displayed. Alcoholic beverages shall not be sold or charged for in any way by the commercial lifestyle center licensee. The licensee shall post appropriate signage clearly demarcating for the public the boundaries of the licensed premises; however, no physical barriers shall be required for this purpose. The licensee shall provide adequate security for the licensed premises to ensure compliance with the applicable provisions of this subtitle and Board regulations.

Mixed beverage port restaurant licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages for consumption in dining areas and other designated areas of such restaurant. Such license may be granted only to persons operating a business (i) that is primarily engaged in the sale of meals; (ii) that is located on property owned by the United States government or an agency thereof and used as a port of entry to or egress from the United States; and (iii) whose gross receipts from the sale of food cooked, or prepared, and consumed on the premises and nonalcoholic beverages served on the premises, after issuance of such license, amount to at least 45 percent of the gross receipts from the sale of mixed beverages and food. For the purposes of this subdivision, other designated areas shall include outdoor dining areas, whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises, which outdoor dining areas may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare, provided such areas are under the control of the licensee and approved by the Board. Such noncontiguous designated areas shall not be approved for any retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of § 4.1-201. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to § 4.1-233.1.

Annual mixed beverage special events licenses to (i) a duly organized nonprofit corporation or association operating either a performing arts facility or an art education and exhibition facility; (ii) a nonprofit corporation or association chartered by Congress for the preservation of sites, buildings, and objects significant in American history and culture; (iii) persons operating an agricultural event and entertainment park or similar facility that has a minimum of 50,000 square feet of indoor exhibit space and equine and other livestock show areas, which includes barns, pavilions, or other structures equipped with roofs, exterior walls, and open-door or closed-door access; or (iv) a locality for special events conducted on the premises of a museum for historic interpretation that is owned and operated by the locality. The operation in all cases shall be upon premises owned by such licensee or occupied under a bona fide lease, the original term of which was for more than one year’s duration. Such license shall authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages during scheduled events and performances for on-premises consumption in areas upon the licensed premises approved by the Board.

Mixed beverage casino licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to (i) sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in areas designated by the Board, after consultation with the mixed beverage casino licensee, without regard to the amount of gross receipts from the sale of food prepared and consumed on the premises and (ii) provide complimentary mixed beverages to patrons for on-premises consumption in private areas or restricted access areas designated by the Board, after consultation with the mixed beverage casino licensee. Designated areas may include any areas on the premises of the mixed beverage casino licensee, including entertainment venues, private rooms, conference rooms, hotels, pools, marinas, or green spaces. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption and in closed containers for off-premises consumption in accordance with the provisions of this subdivision governing mixed beverages; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to § 4.1-233.1. Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, a mixed beverage casino licensee may exercise the privileges of its license as set forth in this subdivision during all hours of operation of the casino gaming establishment; however, such licensee shall not sell wine or beer for off-premises consumption between the hours of 12 a.m. and 6 a.m.

A mixed beverage casino licensee may (a) provide patrons gifts of alcoholic beverages in closed containers for personal consumption off the licensed premises or in areas designated by the Board, after consultation with the mixed beverage casino licensee, and (b) enable patrons who participate in a loyalty or reward credit program to redeem credits for the purchase of alcoholic beverages for on-premises consumption. A summary of the operation of such loyalty or reward credit program shall be provided to the Board upon request.

A mixed beverage casino license may only be issued to a casino gaming establishment owned by an operator licensed under Article 3 (§

58.1-4108

et seq.) of Chapter 41 of Title 58.1.

The Board may grant an on-and-off-premises wine and beer license to the following:

Hotels, restaurants, and clubs, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer (i) in closed containers for off-premises consumption or (ii) for on-premises consumption, either with or without meals, in dining areas and other designated areas of such restaurants, or in dining areas, private guest rooms, and other designated areas of such hotels or clubs, for consumption only in such rooms and areas. However, with regard to a hotel classified by the Board as (a) a resort complex, the Board may authorize the sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages in all areas within the resort complex deemed appropriate by the Board or (b) a limited service hotel, the Board may authorize the sale and consumption of alcoholic beverages in dining areas, private guest rooms, and other designated areas to persons to whom overnight lodging is being provided, for on-premises consumption in such rooms or areas, and without regard to the amount of gross receipts from the sale of food prepared and consumed on the premises, provided that at least one meal is provided each day by the hotel to such guests. With regard to facilities registered in accordance with Chapter 49 (§

38.2-4900

et seq.) of Title 38.2 as continuing care communities that are also licensed by the Board under this subdivision, any resident may, upon authorization of the licensee, keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas covered by the license. For purposes of this subdivision, “other designated areas” includes outdoor dining areas, whether or not contiguous to the licensed premises, which may have more than one means of ingress and egress to an adjacent public thoroughfare, provided that such outdoor dining areas are under the control of the licensee and approved by the Board. Such noncontiguous designated areas shall not be approved for any retail license issued pursuant to subdivision A 5 of §

4.1-201

.

Hospitals, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer (i) in the rooms of patients for their on-premises consumption only in such rooms, provided the consent of the patient’s attending physician is first obtained or (ii) in closed containers for off-premises consumption.

Rural grocery stores, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption. No license shall be granted unless (i) the grocery store is located in any town or in a rural area outside the corporate limits of any city or town and (ii) it appears affirmatively that a substantial public demand for such licensed establishment exists and that public convenience and the purposes of this subtitle will be promoted by granting the license.

Coliseums, stadiums, and racetracks, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer during any event and immediately subsequent thereto to patrons within all seating areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, and additional locations designated by the Board (i) in closed containers for off-premises consumption or (ii) in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license. Such licenses may be granted to persons operating food concessions at coliseums, stadiums, racetracks, or similar facilities.

Performing arts food concessionaires, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer during the performance of any event to patrons within all seating areas, concourses, walkways, or concession areas, or other areas approved by the Board (i) in closed containers for off-premises consumption or (ii) in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license. Such licenses may be granted to persons operating food concessions at any outdoor performing arts amphitheater, arena, or similar facility that (a) has seating for more than 20,000 persons and is located in Prince William County or the City of Virginia Beach; (b) has seating or capacity for more than 3,500 persons and is located in the County of Albemarle, Alleghany, Augusta, Nelson, Pittsylvania, or Rockingham or the City of Charlottesville, Danville, or Roanoke; or (c) has capacity for more than 9,500 persons and is located in Henrico County.

Exhibition halls, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer during the event to patrons or attendees within all seating areas, exhibition areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, and such additional locations designated by the Board in such facilities (i) in closed containers for off-premises consumption or (ii) in paper, plastic, or similar disposable containers or in single original metal cans for on-premises consumption. Upon authorization of the licensee, any person may keep and consume his own lawfully acquired alcoholic beverages on the premises in all areas and locations covered by the license. Such licenses may be granted to persons operating food concessions at exhibition or exposition halls, convention centers, or similar facilities located in any county operating under the urban county executive form of government or any city that is completely surrounded by such county. For purposes of this subdivision, “exhibition or exposition hall” and “convention centers” mean facilities conducting private or public trade shows or exhibitions in an indoor facility having in excess of 100,000 square feet of floor space.

Concert and dinner-theaters, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer during events to patrons or attendees within all seating areas, exhibition areas, concourses, walkways, concession areas, dining areas, and such additional locations designated by the Board in such facilities, for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption. Persons licensed pursuant to this subdivision shall serve food, prepared on or off premises, whenever wine or beer is served. Such licenses may be granted to persons operating concert or dinner-theater venues on property fronting Natural Bridge School Road in Natural Bridge Station and formerly operated as Natural Bridge High School.

Historic cinema houses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer, either with or without meals, during any showing of a motion picture to patrons to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold, for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption. The privileges of this license shall be limited to the premises of the historic cinema house regularly occupied and utilized as such.

Nonprofit museums, which shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer for on-premises consumption or in closed containers for off-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board. Such licenses may be granted to persons operating a nonprofit museum exempt from taxation under § 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, located in the Town of Front Royal, and dedicated to educating the consuming public about historic beer products. The privileges of this license shall be limited to the premises of the museum, regularly occupied and utilized as such.

The Board may grant the following off-premises wine and beer licenses:

Retail off-premises wine and beer licenses, which may be granted to a convenience grocery store, delicatessen, drugstore, gift shop, gourmet oyster house, gourmet shop, grocery store, or marina store as defined in §

4.1-100

and Board regulations. Such license shall authorize the licensee to sell wine and beer in closed containers for off-premises consumption and, notwithstanding the provisions of §

4.1-308

, to give to any person to whom wine or beer may be lawfully sold a sample of wine or beer for on-premises consumption; however, no single sample shall exceed four ounces of beer or two ounces of wine and no more than 12 ounces of beer or five ounces of wine shall be served to any person per day. The licensee may also give samples of wine and beer in designated areas at events held by the licensee for the purpose of featuring and educating the consuming public about the alcoholic beverages being tasted. With the consent of the licensee, farm wineries, wineries, breweries, distillers, and wholesale licensees or authorized representatives of such licensees may participate in such tastings, including the pouring of samples. The licensee shall comply with any food inventory and sales volume requirements established by Board regulation.

Gourmet brewing shop licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell to any person to whom wine or beer may be lawfully sold, ingredients for making wine or brewing beer, including packaging, and to rent to such persons facilities for manufacturing, fermenting, and bottling such wine or beer, for off-premises consumption in accordance with subdivision 6 of §

4.1-200

.

Confectionery licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to prepare and sell on the licensed premises for off-premises consumption confectionery that contains five percent or less alcohol by volume. Any alcohol contained in such confectionery shall not be in liquid form at the time such confectionery is sold.

The Board may grant the following banquet, special event, and tasting licenses:

Per-day event licenses.

Banquet licenses to persons in charge of private banquets, and to duly organized nonprofit corporations or associations in charge of special events, which shall authorize the licensee to sell or give wine and beer in rooms or areas approved by the Board for the occasion for on-premises consumption in such rooms or areas. Licensees who are nonprofit corporations or associations conducting fundraisers (i) shall also be authorized to sell wine, as part of any fundraising activity, in closed containers for off-premises consumption to persons to whom wine may be lawfully sold; (ii) shall be limited to no more than one such fundraiser per year; and (iii) if conducting such fundraiser through an online meeting platform, may ship such wine, in accordance with Board regulations, in closed containers to persons located within the Commonwealth. Except as provided in §

4.1-215

, a separate license shall be required for each day of each banquet or special event. For the purposes of this subdivision, when the location named in the original application for a license is outdoors, the application may also name an alternative location in the event of inclement weather. However, no such license shall be required of any hotel, restaurant, or club holding a retail wine and beer license.

Mixed beverage special events licenses to a duly organized nonprofit corporation or association in charge of a special event, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption in areas approved by the Board on the premises of the place designated in the license. A separate license shall be required for each day of each special event.

Mixed beverage club events licenses to a club holding a wine and beer club license, which shall authorize the licensee to sell and serve mixed beverages for on-premises consumption by club members and their guests in areas approved by the Board on the club premises. A separate license shall be required for each day of each club event. No more than 12 such licenses shall be granted to a club in any calendar year. The granting of a license pursuant to this subdivision shall automatically authorize the licensee to obtain a license to sell and serve wine and beer for on-premises consumption; however, the licensee shall be required to pay the local fee required for such additional license pursuant to §

4.1-233.1

.

Tasting licenses, which shall authorize the licensee to sell or give samples of alcoholic beverages of the type specified in the license in designated areas at events held by the licensee. A tasting license shall be issued for the purpose of featuring and educating the consuming public about the alcoholic beverages being tasted. A separate license shall be required for each day of each tasting event. No tasting license shall be required for conduct authorized by §

4.1-201.1

.

Annual licenses.

Annual banquet licenses to duly organized private nonprofit fraternal, patriotic, or charitable membership organizations that are exempt from state and federal taxation and in charge of banquets conducted exclusively for members and their guests, which shall authorize the licensee to serve wine and beer in rooms or areas approved by the Board for the occasion for on-premises consumption in such rooms or areas. Such license shall authorize the licensee to conduct no more than 12 banquets per calendar year. For the purposes of this subdivision, when the location named in the original application for a license is outdoors, the application may also name an alternative location in the event of inclement weather. However, no such license shall be required of any hotel, restaurant, or club holding a retail wine and beer license.
